Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB606.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1556. Early Human Life Development Education.--(a) (1) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each school entity shall provide early human life development instruction to students. The early human life development instruction shall be integrated within the biology courses of study required in accordance with the State Board of Education regulations.(2) The early human life development instruction under paragraph (1) shall, at a minimum, include:(i) An ultrasound video at least five minutes in length 1234567891011121314151617181920 showing human development of the brain, heart, sex organs and other vital organs at the following intervals:(A) Eight (8) weeks' gestational age.(B) Twelve (12) weeks' gestational age.(C) Seventeen (17) weeks' gestational age.(D) Twenty-two (22) weeks' gestational age.(E) Twenty-seven (27) weeks' gestational age.(F) Thirty-two (32) weeks' gestational age.(G) Thirty-seven (37) weeks' gestational age.(ii) A presentation of a high-quality, computer-generated, animated rendering, showing the process of fertilization and every stage of human development inside the uterus, noting significant markers in cell growth and organ development for every significant marker of pregnancy until birth.(b) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Early human life development instruction." Any oral, written or digital lesson, lecture or presentation intended to educate students on topics about human biology before birth, including pregnancy and human development during pregnancy."Gestational age." The age of an unborn child as calculated from the first day of the last menstrual period of the pregnant woman."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school."Ultrasound video." A video produced through the use of an ultrasound machine which is of sufficient quality to be used in determining gestational age.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0606PN0614 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930